Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-22-131 as
follows:
39-22-131. Tax credit for contributions to a health savings
account - high deductible insurance plan - tax preference
performance statement - legislative declaration - repeal. (1) (a) IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH REQUIRES EACH BILL
THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE A TAX PREFERENCE
PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY LEGISLATIVE
DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE
PURPOSE OF THE TAX EXPENDITURE CREATED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION IS TO PROVIDE TAX RELIEF TO CERTAIN INDIVIDUALS BY
PROVIDING A FINANCIAL INCENTIVE FOR MAKING CONTRIBUTIONS TO
HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNTS.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, SHALL MEASURE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION BY
DETERMINING THE INCREASE IN CONTRIBUTIONS TO HEALTH SAVINGS
ACCOUNTS DUE TO THE CREDIT.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO
CONTRIBUTES TO A HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT THAT SUPPORTS A HIGH
DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH INSURANCE PLAN AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. SEC. 223
-2- SB25B-006

(c)(2), INCLUDING A QUALIFYING HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH INSURANCE
PLAN ISSUED BY AN EXCHANGE ESTABLISHED UNDER THE COLORADO
HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE CREATED IN ARTICLE 22 OF TITLE 10, IS
ALLOWED A CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAXES DUE ON THE
INDIVIDUAL'S INCOME UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22 IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION. SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, THE CREDIT IS AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT CONTRIBUTED
TO THE HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR
WHICH THE CREDIT IS CLAIMED.
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT CLAIMED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION SHALL NOT EXCEED:
(a) FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR A SINGLE FILER;
(b) ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR JOINT FILERS; AND
(c) ONE THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR CONTRIBUTIONS
TO A FAMILY HEALTH PLAN, WHETHER THE CONTRIBUTION IS BY A SINGLE
FILER OR JOINT FILERS.
(4) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION EXCEEDS THE INCOME TAXES DUE ON THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S
INCOME, THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT NOT USED TO OFFSET INCOME TAXES
MUST NOT BE CARRIED FORWARD AS TAX CREDITS AGAINST THE RESIDENT
INDIVIDUAL'S SUBSEQUENT YEARS' INCOME TAX LIABILITY AND MUST NOT
BE REFUNDED TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
(5) THE CREDIT ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE
PUBLISHED IN RULES ADOPTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND MUST BE
INCLUDED IN INCOME TAX FORMS FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING
JANUARY 1, 2026, AND FOR SUBSEQUENT TAX YEARS.
(6) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2030.
-3- SB25B-006

SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- SB25B-006